District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.05

Auditing.

Pursuant to provisions of IRP, the Mayor shall adopt audit procedures to review the uniform mileage schedules and fleet records of apportioned operators declaring the District of Columbia as their base jurisdiction. The audit procedures shall involve at least 15% of the IRP apportioned vehicles declaring the District of Columbia as their base jurisdiction base over a 5-year period. The 5-year period will commence October 1, 1997.

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 6, 44 DCR 3620

History

1981 Ed., § 40-125.

Prior Codifications

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1507.01.

Temporary Addition of Section